District of Columbia statutes.
49-433

Unit and company funds.

(a)

(1)

There is authorized to be created and maintained for each separate unit of the District of Columbia National Guard a unit fund. Expenditures from such unit fund shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Commanding General of the District of Columbia National Guard and all applicable federal and District laws, rules, and regulations.

(2)

There is authorized to be deposited in each unit fund such moneys as may be received from gifts, bequests, and contributions, including federal and District contributions, and such amounts as may be appropriated to such unit funds by the District of Columbia.

(3)

The unit commander of each unit is the custodian of the unit fund. The unit commander shall:

(A)

Receive, safely keep, and properly disburse, as the Commanding General may require, the money trusted to the unit commander’s care; and

(B)

Submit to the Adjutant General, on June 30 and December 31 of each year, an itemized statement of money received and disbursed during the preceding 6 months.

(b)

(1)

There is authorized to be created and maintained for each separate company of the District of Columbia National Guard a company fund. Expenditures from such company fund shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations established by the Commanding General of the District of Columbia National Guard and all applicable federal and District laws, rules, and regulations.

(2)

There is authorized to be deposited in each company fund such moneys as may be received from gifts, bequests, and contributions, including federal and District contributions, and such amounts as may be appropriated to such company fund by the District of Columbia.

(3)

The commanding officer of each company is the custodian of the company fund. The commanding officer shall:

(A)

Receive, safely keep, and properly disburse, as the Commanding General may require, the money trusted to the commanding officer’s care; and

(B)

Submit to the Adjutant General, on June 30 and December 31 of each year, an itemized statement of money received and disbursed during the preceding 6 months.

History

Dec. 8, 2009, D.C. Law 18-83, § 4, 56 DCR 8142

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of National Guard Morale Welfare and Recreation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-177, August 4, 2009, 56 DCR 6889).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of National Guard Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-226, October 28, 2009, 56 DCR 8664).